Maryland, session 2025, SB0345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
5–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0345*

SENATE BILL 345
(b) “Active ingredient” means:
(1) In the case of a pesticide other than a plant regulator, defoliant, or
desiccant, an ingredient which prevents, destroys, repels, or mitigates insects, nematodes,
fungi, rodents, weeds, bacteria, or other pests;
(2) In the case of a plant regulator, an ingredient which, through
physiological action, accelerates or retards the rate of growth or rate of maturation or
otherwise alters the behavior of ornamental or crop plants or their produce;
(3) In the case of a defoliant, an ingredient which causes the leaves or
foliage to drop from a plant; and
(4) In the case of a desiccant, an ingredient which artificially accelerates
the drying of plant tissue.
5–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Certified applicator” means a person who is certified by the Secretary under
this subtitle.
(g) “Labeling” means all written, printed, or graphic matter:
(1) Accompanying the pesticide or device at any time; or
(2) To which reference is made on the label or in literature accompanying
the pesticide or device, except to current official publications of the:
(i) Environmental Protection Agency;
(ii) United States Departments of Agriculture, Interior, and Health
and Human Services;
(iii) State experiment stations;
(iv) State agricultural colleges; or
(v) Other similar federal or State institutions or agencies authorized
by law to conduct research in the field of pesticides.
(l) “Pesticide” means any substance or mixture of substances intended for:
(1) Preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest;
(2) Use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant; or

SENATE BILL 345 3
(3) Use as a spray adjuvant such as a wetting agent or adhesive.
5–210.6.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACTIVE INGREDIENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF
THIS TITLE.
(3) “PFAS CHEMICALS” MEANS A CLASS OF FLUORINATED
CHEMICALS THAT CONTAIN AT LEAST ONE FULLY FLUORINATED CARBON ATOM,
INCLUDING PERFLUOROALKYL AND POLYFLUOROALKYL SUBSTANCES.
(4) “PFAS PESTICIDE” MEANS A PESTICIDE THAT HAS PFAS
CHEMICALS LISTED AS AN ACTIVE INGREDIENT ON THE LABELING.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A LIST OF
EACH PFAS PESTICIDE THAT IS REGISTERED WITH THE SECRETARY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) POST THE LIST DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ON
ITS WEBSITE; AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE THE LIST TO ALL CERTIFIED APPLICATORS.
(C) (1) BEGINNING JUNE 1, 2026, A PERSON MAY NOT USE A PFAS
PESTICIDE LISTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) AT A HEALTH CARE FACILITY;
(II) AT A SCHOOL;
(III) AT A DAY CARE OPERATION;
(IV) FOR RESIDENTIAL LAWN CARE; OR
(V) FOR COMMERCIAL MOSQUITO SPRAYING OPERATIONS.
(2) BEFORE JUNE 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY ALL
CERTIFIED APPLICATORS OF THE PROHIBITION IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS

SENATE BILL 345
SUBSECTION.
(D) BEGINNING JUNE 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REGISTER A
PFAS PESTICIDE FOR SALE IN THE STATE.
(E) BEGINNING JUNE 1, 2028, A PERSON MAY NOT USE A PFAS PESTICIDE
IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.